Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.030

Application of chapter to district courts.

All the provisions of this chapter shall apply to proceedings before district courts of this state.

[ 1987 c 442 s 1003; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 2. Formerly RCW 7.33.020.]